src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-sgine_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sgine: # 7 x contlex sg ine -- inte kontrollerad 
    afäärimies+N+Sg+Ine: afäärimiehessä
    eusmies+N+Sg+Ine: eusmiehessä
    frahtimies+N+Sg+Ine: frahtimiehessä
    hakkomies+N+Sg+Ine: hakkomiehessä
    ikämies+N+Sg+Ine: ikämiehessä
    irtimies+N+Sg+Ine: irtimiehessä
    iskemämies+N+Sg+Ine: iskemämiehessä
    elläin+N+Sg+Ine: elläimessä
    irtain+N+Sg+Ine: irtaimessa
    istuin+N+Sg+Ine: istuimessa
    jäänhalkein+N+Sg+Ine: jäänhalkeimessa
    jäsenyin+N+Sg+Ine: jäsenykimessä
    äänestys+N+Sg+Ine: äänestyksessä
    äärettömyys+N+Sg+Ine: äärettömyyessä 
  #  äes+N+Sg+Ine: äkeksessä # VetEj
    ähmäänys+N+Sg+Ine: ähmäänyksessä
    ajos+N+Sg+Ine: ajoksessa
    äkäsyys+N+Sg+Ine: äkäsyyessä
    annos+N+Sg+Ine: annoksessa
    ahmajäsen+N+Sg+Ine: ahmajäsenessä
    ahven+N+Sg+Ine: ahvenessa
    askel+N+Sg+Ine: [askelheessa, askehleessa]
    höyhen+N+Sg+Ine: höyhenessä
    isosisar+N+Sg+Ine: isosisaressa
    jääntanner+N+Sg+Ine: [jääntanterheessa, jääntantehreessa]
    jalkatyär+N+Sg+Ine: jalkatyttäressä
    ahneus+N+Sg+Ine: ahneuessa
    falskeus+N+Sg+Ine: falskeuessa
    fariseeus+N+Sg+Ine: fariseeuessa
    fiineys+N+Sg+Ine: fiineyessä
    fiiniys+N+Sg+Ine: fiiniyessä
    ilfheys+N+Sg+Ine: ilfheyessä
    ilkeys+N+Sg+Ine: ilkeyessä
    jiddisch+N+Sg+Ine: jiddischissä
    -kielinen+N+Sg+Ine: -kielisessä
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Ine: äärheisessä
    ainukainen+N+Sg+Ine: ainukaisessa
    ammuminen+N+Sg+Ine: ammumisessa
    ampiainen+N+Sg+Ine: ampiaisessa
    ästiitiäinen+N+Sg+Ine: ästiitiäisessä
    äykiäinen+N+Sg+Ine: äykiäisessä
    aavistus+N+Sg+Ine: aavistuksessa
    ahistus+N+Sg+Ine: ahistuksessa
    aivastus+N+Sg+Ine: aivastuksessa
    ajatus+N+Sg+Ine: ajatuksessa
    anomus+N+Sg+Ine: anomuksessa
    arvaus+N+Sg+Ine: arvauksessa
    astutus+N+Sg+Ine: astutuksessa
    aamuvyö+N+Sg+Ine: aamuvyössä
    äkäpää+N+Sg+Ine: äkäpäässä
    äkkipää+N+Sg+Ine: äkkipäässä
    ärräpää+N+Sg+Ine: ärräpäässä
    asepuu+N+Sg+Ine: asepuussa
    takkaa-ajo+N+Sg+Ine: takkaa-ajossa
    a-malmi+N+Sg+Ine: a-malmissa
    ääkkä+N+Sg+Ine: ääkässä
    aalto+N+Sg+Ine: aalossa
    abortti+N+Sg+Ine: abortissa
    aho+N+Sg+Ine: ahossa
    äijäfaari+N+Sg+Ine: äijäfaarissa
    aihe+N+Sg+Ine: aihheessa
    äile+N+Sg+Ine: [äihleessä, äilheessä] 
    aine+N+Sg+Ine: [aihneessa, ainheessa]
    alote+N+Sg+Ine: alotheessa
    alue+N+Sg+Ine: aluheessa
    akleija+N+Sg+Ine: akleijassa
    äkseerinki+N+Sg+Ine: äkseeringissä
    almunakka+N+Sg+Ine: almunakassa
    alttari+N+Sg+Ine: alttarissa
    ämmäkkö+N+Sg+Ine: ämmäkössä
    ammunta+N+Sg+Ine: ammunassa
    ääri+N+Sg+Ine: ääressä
    äitiväki+N+Sg+Ine: äitiväessä
    ehontähti+N+Sg+Ine: ehontähessä
    ehtotähti+N+Sg+Ine: ehtotähessä
    elämänonni+N+Sg+Ine: elämänonnessa
    epiteemi+N+Sg+Ine: epiteemissä
    äitinkieli+N+Sg+Ine: äitinkielessä
    äitipuoli+N+Sg+Ine: äitipuolessa
    asuntolohi+N+Sg+Ine: asuntolohessa
    hiili+N+Sg+Ine: hiilessä
    aikakausi+N+Sg+Ine: aikakauessa
    färivesi+N+Sg+Ine: färiveessä
    hangonvarsi+N+Sg+Ine: hangonvarressa
    hirsi+N+Sg+Ine: hirressä
    ikävuosi+N+Sg+Ine: [ikävuoessa, ikävuessa, ikävuuessa]
    ilovesi+N+Sg+Ine: iloveessä
    imulapsi+N+Sg+Ine: imulapsessa
    irtilapsi+N+Sg+Ine: irtilapsessa
    jalkalapsi+N+Sg+Ine: jalkalapsessa
    jumalanlapsi+N+Sg+Ine: jumalanlapsessa
    kapalolapsi+N+Sg+Ine: kapalolapsessa
    kasvattilapsi+N+Sg+Ine: kasvattilapsessa
    kusilapsi+N+Sg+Ine: kusilapsessa
    höttölumi+N+Sg+Ine: höttölumessa
    iloliemi+N+Sg+Ine: iloliemessä
    kalanliemi+N+Sg+Ine: kalanliemessä
    kankhaanloimi+N+Sg+Ine: kankhaanloimessa
    lähetystoimi+N+Sg+Ine: lähetystoimessa
    liemi+N+Sg+Ine: liemessä
    auttavaisuus+N+Sg+Ine: auttavaisuuessa
    hankaluus+N+Sg+Ine: hankaluuessa
    hiljasuus+N+Sg+Ine: hiljasuuessa
    huoruus+N+Sg+Ine: huoruuessa
    iänkaikkisuus+N+Sg+Ine: iänkaikkisuuessa
    itusuus+N+Sg+Ine: itusuuessa
    jatkuvuus+N+Sg+Ine: jatkuvuuessa
    raja-asukas+N+Sg+Ine: raja-asukhaassa
    # aijas+N+Sg+Ine: aijaassa # VetEj
    ankerias+N+Sg+Ine: ankerihaassa
    apilas+N+Sg+Ine: [apilhaassa, apihlaassa]
    asukas+N+Sg+Ine: asukhaassa
    ehokas+N+Sg+Ine: ehokhaassa
    evankeeljum+N+Sg+Ine: evankeeljumissa
    Antinpäivä+N+Sg+Ine: Antinpäivässä
    Kruunu+N+Sg+Ine: Kruunussa
    Kyriiri+N+Sg+Ine: Kyriirissä
    Laurina+N+Sg+Ine: Laurinassa
    Mikkelinpäivä+N+Sg+Ine: Mikkelinpäivässä
    norrlänska+N+Sg+Ine: norrlänskassa
    TV-masti+N+Sg+Ine: TV-mastissa
    äänensävy+N+Sg+Ine: äänensävyssä
    alunastifti+N+Sg+Ine: alunastiftissä
    romani chib+N+Sg+Ine: romani chibissä
